District of Columbia statutes.
2-1403.08

Posting of notice of complaint in housing accommodation.

If a finding of probable cause has been made, as to a complaint of discrimination in housing, and the property owner, or his duly authorized agent, will not agree voluntarily to withhold from the market the subject housing accommodations for a period of 10 days from the date of such finding of probable cause, the Office may cause to be posted on the door of said housing accommodations for a period of 10 days from the date of said finding a notice advising that said accommodations are the subject of a complaint before the Office and that prospective transferees will take such housing accommodations at their peril. Any destruction, defacement, alteration or removal of the notice thereof, by the owner or his agents, servants and employees, shall be punishable, upon conviction, by a fine of up to $300, or by imprisonment for not more than 10 days, or both.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title III, § 308, 24 DCR 6038
1981 Ed., § 1-2548.
1973 Ed., § 6-2288.